RBMT/apertium_HOWTO/apertium-hbs.hbs.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>

<alphabet>ABCČĆDDžĐEFGHIJKLLjMNNjOPRSŠTUVZŽabcčćddžđefghijklljmnnjoprsštuvzž</alphabet>

<sdefs>
   <sdef n="n"/>
   <sdef n="sg"/>
   <sdef n="pl"/>
   <sdef n="vblex"/>
   <sdef n="p1"/>
   <sdef n="p2"/>
   <sdef n="p3"/>
   <sdef n="pri"/>
</sdefs>

<pardefs>
	<pardef n="e_je__yat">
	  <e>
	    <p>
		<l>e</l>
		<r>e</r>
	    </p>
	  </e>
	  <e>
	    <p>
		<l>je</l>
		<r>e</r>
	    </p>
	  </e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="gramofon__n">
	   <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	   <e><p><l>i</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	   <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="rečni/k__n">
	   <e><p><l>k</l><r>k<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	   <e><p><l>ci</l><r>k<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	   <e><p><l>ke</l><r>k<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="vid/eti__vblex">
	   <e><p><l>im</l><r>eti<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	   <e><p><l>iš</l><r>eti<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	   <e><p><l>i</l><r>eti<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	   <e><p><l>imo</l><r>eti<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	   <e><p><l>ite</l><r>eti<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	   <e><p><l>e</l><r>eti<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
</pardefs>

<section id="main" type="standard">
	<e lm="gramofon"><i>gramofon</i><par n="gramofon__n"/></e>
	<e lm="videti"><i>vid</i><par n="vid/eti__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="rečnik"><i>r</i><par n="e_je__yat"/><i>čni</i><par n="rečni/k__n"/></e>
</section>

</dictionary>
